dev/verb/verb.ne.dix
  <!-- बोल्; बोल; 12 -->
    <pardef n="बोल/्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्न</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्नु</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ाउन</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दो</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दै</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दा</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ाउँदा</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्ने</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िने</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्छ्यौ</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दिनँ</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पाइन्छन्; पाइन्छन्; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पाइन्छन्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ठान; ठान; 2 -->
    <pardef n="ठान__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ें</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- झोक्; झोक्; 1 -->
    <pardef n="झोक्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>किए</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- वोल्; वोल्; 1 -->
    <pardef n="वोल्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सक्तिन; सक्तिन; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सक्तिन__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>थें</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- चाउर; चाउर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="चाउर__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िस्</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- चाहि; चाहि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="चाहि__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- चाहा; चाहा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="चाहा__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बोक; बोक; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बोक__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िदिने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- उराठ; उराठ; 2 -->
    <pardef n="उराठ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>लाग्दो</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>लाग्दी</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- निकाल; निकाल; 1 -->
    <pardef n="निकाल__opt">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ुँ</l>
          <r><s n="opt"/><s n="m"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- खट्; खट्; 1 -->
    <pardef n="खट्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- फूकाल; फूकाल; 1 -->
    <pardef n="फूकाल__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="impers"/><s n="infml"/><s n="imp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- घत; घत; 1 -->
    <pardef n="घत__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>लाग्दो</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- तोक्; तोक; 2 -->
    <pardef n="तोक/्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्ने</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िए</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- लाउँ; लाउँ; 2 -->
    <pardef n="लाउँ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दै</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दा</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- उक्लन्; उक्लन्; 1 -->
    <pardef n="उक्लन्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>छस्</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- लुछ्; लुछ्; 1 -->
    <pardef n="लुछ्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पटाउ; पटाउ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पटाउ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ँदो</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- केलाउँ; केलाउँ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="केलाउँ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दा</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- थर्काउ; थर्काउ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="थर्काउ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- खाल्; खाल; 1 -->
    <pardef n="खाल/्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िस्</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बेहोर्; बेहोर्; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बेहोर्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- लुछ्ल्; लुछ्ल; 1 -->
    <pardef n="लुछ्ल/्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ास्</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- खु; खु; 2 -->
    <pardef n="खु__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दो</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>वाउँछौ</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- लुट्; लुट; 1 -->
    <pardef n="लुट/्__opt">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ाइदिऊँ</l>
          <r>्<s n="opt"/><s n="m"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- लुट्; लुट्; 1 -->
    <pardef n="लुट्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="बोल्"><i>बोल</i><par n="बोल/्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="पाइन्छन्"><i>पाइन्छन्</i><par n="पाइन्छन्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ठान"><i>ठान</i><par n="ठान__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="झोक्"><i>झोक्</i><par n="झोक्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="वोल्"><i>वोल्</i><par n="वोल्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="सक्तिन"><i>सक्तिन</i><par n="सक्तिन__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="चाउर"><i>चाउर</i><par n="चाउर__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="चाहि"><i>चाहि</i><par n="चाहि__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="चाहा"><i>चाहा</i><par n="चाहा__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="बोक"><i>बोक</i><par n="बोक__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="उराठ"><i>उराठ</i><par n="उराठ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="निकाल"><i>निकाल</i><par n="निकाल__opt"/></e>
    <e lm="खट्"><i>खट्</i><par n="खट्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="फूकाल"><i>फूकाल</i><par n="फूकाल__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="घत"><i>घत</i><par n="घत__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="तोक्"><i>तोक</i><par n="तोक/्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="लाउँ"><i>लाउँ</i><par n="लाउँ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="उक्लन्"><i>उक्लन्</i><par n="उक्लन्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="लुछ्"><i>लुछ्</i><par n="लुछ्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="पटाउ"><i>पटाउ</i><par n="पटाउ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="केलाउँ"><i>केलाउँ</i><par n="केलाउँ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="थर्काउ"><i>थर्काउ</i><par n="थर्काउ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="खाल्"><i>खाल</i><par n="खाल/्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="बेहोर्"><i>बेहोर्</i><par n="बेहोर्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="लुछ्ल्"><i>लुछ्ल</i><par n="लुछ्ल/्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="खु"><i>खु</i><par n="खु__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="लुट्"><i>लुट</i><par n="लुट/्__opt"/></e>
    <e lm="लुट्"><i>लुट्</i><par n="लुट्__vblex"/></e>
